apertium-bre.bre.dix
    <pardef n="/gouzout__vblex">
      <e><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouzout</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouezet</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouvezet</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouzon</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>oaran</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouezan</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouian</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouzout</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouzez</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouezez</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>oarez</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>oar</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>’oar</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouzomp</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouezomp</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>oaromp</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouzoc’h</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouezoc’h</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouzit</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouezit</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouzont</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouezont</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouzer</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouezer</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouien</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouies</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouie</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouiemp</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouiec’h</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouient</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouied</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouezis</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouejout</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouezas</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouejomp</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouejoc’h</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouejont</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouejod</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouezin</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouzin</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouezi</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouezo</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouio</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouezimp</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouezot</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouezint</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouezor</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>oufen</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouifen</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>oufes</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouifes</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>oufe</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouife</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>oufemp</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouifemp</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>oufec’h</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouifec’h</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>oufent</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouifent</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>oufed</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouifent</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouijen</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouijes</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><par n="initial-g_null"/><p><l>ouije</l><r>gouzout<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    <e lm="gouzout"><i/><par n="/gouzout__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gouzout en a-raok"><par n="/gouzout__vblex"/><p><l><b/>en<b/>a-raok</l><r><g><b/>en<b/>a-raok</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="gouzout brezhoneg"><par n="/gouzout__vblex"/><p><l><b/>brezhoneg</l><r><g><b/>brezhoneg</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="gouzout galleg"><par n="/gouzout__vblex"/><p><l><b/>galleg</l><r><g><b/>galleg</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="gouzout lenn"><par n="/gouzout__vblex"/><p><l><b/>lenn</l><r><g><b/>lenn</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="gouzout lenn ha skrivañ"><par n="/gouzout__vblex"/><p><l><b/>lenn<b/>ha<b/>skrivañ</l><r><g><b/>lenn<b/>ha<b/>skrivañ</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="goût" r="LR"><i/><par n="/gouzout__vblex"/></e>
